California statutes. Business and Professions Code
Aiding or abetting an unlicensed person to evade the provisions of this chapter, or combining or conspiring with an unlicensed person, or allowing one’s license to be used by an unlicensed person, or acting as an agent or partner, associate, or otherwise of an unlicensed person, with the intent to evade the provisions of this chapter constitutes a cause for disciplinary action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 680, Sec. 12.   (AB 1262)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6582.

All proceedings against a licensee for any violation of this chapter or any regulations adopted by the bureau shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and shall be prosecuted by the Attorney General’s office, and the bureau shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 491, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6582.2.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 6582 and Section 11415.60 of the Government Code, the bureau may enter into a settlement with a licensee or applicant instead of the issuance of an accusation or statement of issues against that licensee or applicant.

(b) The settlement shall identify the factual basis for the action being taken and the statutes or regulations violated.

(c) Any settlement with a licensee executed pursuant to this section shall be considered discipline and a public record and shall be posted on the bureau’s Internet Web site. Any settlement with an applicant executed pursuant to this section shall be considered a public record
 and shall be posted on the bureau’s Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 448, Sec. 17.   (SB 543)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6582.5.

Notwithstanding Section 6582, if any violation occurs, in its discretion, the bureau may refer the case to the Attorney General or to the local district attorney for criminal prosecution. The referral of a case for criminal prosecution shall not preclude the bureau from taking any other action provided for in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 491, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6583.

The bureau shall establish a system of administrative citations and fines under Section 125.9 for violations of this chapter, the Professional Fiduciaries Code of Ethics, or any regulation adopted under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 491, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6584.

A license issued under this chapter may be suspended, revoked, denied, or other disciplinary action may be imposed for one or more of the following causes:

(a) Conviction of any felony or any misdemeanor, if the misdemeanor is substantially related to the functions and duties of a professional fiduciary. The record of conviction, or a certified copy thereof, is conclusive evidence of the conviction.

(b) Failure to notify the bureau of a conviction as required by paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 6561.

(c) Fraud or misrepresentation in obtaining a license.

(d) Fraud, dishonesty, corruption, willful violation of duty, gross negligence or incompetence in practice, or unprofessional conduct in, or related to, the practice of a professional fiduciary. For purposes of this section, unprofessional conduct includes, but is not limited to, acts contrary to professional standards concerning any provision of law substantially related to the duties of a professional fiduciary.

(e) Failure to comply with, or to pay a monetary sanction imposed by, a court for failure to provide timely reports. The record of the court order, or a certified copy thereof, is conclusive evidence that the sanction was imposed.

(f) Failure to pay a civil penalty relating to the licensee’s
 professional fiduciary duties.

(g) The revocation of, suspension of, or other disciplinary action against, any other professional license by the State of California or by another state. A certified copy of the revocation, suspension, or disciplinary action is conclusive evidence of that action.

(h) Violation of this chapter or of the applicable provisions of Division 4 (commencing with Section 1400), Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4000), Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 4600), or Division 5 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Probate Code or of any of the statutes, rules, or regulations pertaining to duties or functions of a professional fiduciary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 17.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Revenue [6590. - 6592.]

6590.

All fees collected by the bureau shall be paid into the Professional Fiduciary Fund in the State Treasury, which is hereby created. The money in the fund shall be available to the bureau for expenditure for the purposes of this chapter only upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 491, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6591.

The Professional Fiduciary Fund shall be the successor fund to those funds deposited under the Statewide Registry with the Department of Justice pursuant to Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 2850) of Part 4 of Division 4 of the Probate Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 491, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6592.

(a) The fee for a professional fiduciary examination and reexamination shall be set by the bureau through regulation at the amount necessary to recover the actual costs to develop and administer the examination.

(b) The license fee to obtain a professional fiduciary license shall be set by the bureau.

(c) The renewal fee for a professional fiduciary license shall be set by the bureau.

(d) The bureau shall set the fee to designate a license status of “retired.”

(e) The fee to designate a
 license status of “inactive” shall be set by the bureau.

(f) The bureau shall set the fee to reinstate a license to “active” from a status of “retired” or “inactive.”

(g) The bureau shall set the fees pursuant to subdivisions (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) by regulation at an amount necessary to recover the reasonable costs to the bureau in carrying out those functions pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 336, Sec. 6.   (AB 2024)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Professional Engineers [6700. - 6799.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [6700. - 6706.3.]

6700.

This chapter constitutes the chapter on professional engineers. It may be cited as the Professional Engineers Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 732, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6701.

“Professional engineer,” within the meaning and intent of this act, refers to a person engaged in the professional practice of rendering service or creative work requiring education, training and experience in engineering sciences and the application of special knowledge of the mathematical, physical and engineering sciences in such professional or creative work as consultation, investigation, evaluation, planning or design of public or private utilities, structures, machines, processes, circuits, buildings, equipment or projects, and supervision of construction for the purpose of securing compliance with specifications and design for any such work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

6702.

“Civil engineer” as used in this chapter means a professional engineer in the branch of civil engineering and refers to one who practices or offers to practice civil engineering in any of its phases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

6702.1.

“Electrical engineer” as used in this chapter means a professional engineer in the branch of electrical engineering and refers to one who practices or offers to practice electrical engineering in any of its phases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

6702.2.

“Mechanical engineer” as used in this chapter means a professional engineer in the branch of mechanical engineering and refers to one who practices or offers to practice mechanical engineering in any of its phases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

6703.

The phrase “responsible charge of work” means the independent control and direction, by the use of initiative, skill, and independent judgment, of the investigation or design of professional engineering work or the direct engineering control of such projects. The phrase does not refer to the concept of financial liability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 229, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6703.1.

“Supervision of the construction of engineering structures” means the periodic observation of materials and completed work to determine general compliance with plans, specifications, and design and planning concepts. However, “supervision of the construction of engineering structures” does not include responsibility for the superintendence of construction processes, site conditions, operations, equipment, personnel, or the maintenance of a safe place to work or any safety in, on, or about the site.

For purposes of this subdivision, “periodic observation” means visits by an engineer, or his or her agent, to the site of a work of improvement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 959, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6704.

(a) In order to safeguard life, health, property, and public welfare, no person shall practice civil, electrical, or mechanical engineering unless appropriately licensed or specifically exempted from licensure under this chapter, and only persons licensed under this chapter shall be entitled to take and use the titles “consulting engineer,” “professional engineer,” or “registered engineer,” or any combination of those titles or abbreviations thereof, and according to licensure with the board the engineering branch titles specified in Section 6732, or the authority titles specified in Sections 6736 and 6736.1, or the title “engineer-in-training.”

(b) The provisions of this section shall not prevent the use of the title “consulting engineer” by a person who has qualified for and maintained exemption for using that title under the provisions of Section 6732.1, or by a person licensed as a photogrammetric surveyor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 658, Sec. 89.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6705.

A subordinate is any person who assists a registered professional engineer in the practice of professional engineering without assuming responsible charge of work.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1709.)
-------------------------------------------

6706.

(a) An engineer who voluntarily, without compensation or expectation of compensation, provides structural inspection services at the scene of a declared national, state, or local emergency at the request of a public official, public safety officer, or city or county building inspector acting in an official capacity shall not be liable in negligence for any personal injury, wrongful death, or property damage caused by the engineer’s good faith but negligent inspection of a structure used for human habitation or owned by a public entity for structural integrity or nonstructural elements affecting life and safety.

The immunity provided by this section shall apply only for an inspection that occurs within 30 days of the declared emergency.

Nothing in this section shall provide immunity for gross negligence or willful misconduct.

(b) As used in this section:

(1) “Engineer” means a person registered under this chapter as a professional engineer, including any of the branches thereof.

(2) “Public safety officer” has the meaning given in Section 3301 of the Government Code.

(3) “Public official” means a state or local elected officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1013, Sec. 52.5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6706.3.

Any reference in any law or regulation to a registered engineer, or to a registered civil, electrical, or mechanical engineer, is deemed to refer to a licensed engineer, or to a licensed civil, electrical, or mechanical engineer, as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 59, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [6710. - 6726.4.]

6710.

(a) There is in the Department of Consumer Affairs a Board for Professional Engineers, Land Surveyors, and Geologists, which consists of 15 members.

(b) Any reference in any law or regulation to the Board of Registration for Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors, or the Board for Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors, is deemed to refer to the Board for Professional Engineers, Land Surveyors, and Geologists.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed. Notwithstanding any other law, the repeal of this section renders the board subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 588, Sec. 2.   (AB 3253)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6710.1.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the Board for Professional Engineers, Land Surveyors, and Geologists in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 432, Sec. 2.   (SB 944)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6711.

Each member of the board shall be a citizen of the United States. Five members shall be registered under this chapter. One member shall be licensed under the Professional Land Surveyors’ Act, Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 8700), one member shall be licensed under the Geologist and Geophysicist Act, Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 7800), and eight shall be public members who are not registered under this act, licensed under the Geologist and Geophysicist Act, or licensed under the Professional Land Surveyors’ Act. Each member, except the public members, shall have at least 12 years active experience and shall be of good standing in their profession. Each member shall have been a resident of this state for at least five years immediately preceding their appointment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 588, Sec. 3.   (AB 3253)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6712.

(a) All appointments to the board shall be for a term of four years. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term. Each appointment thereafter shall be for a four-year term expiring on June 30 of the fourth year following the year in which the previous term expired.

(b) Each member shall hold office until the appointment and qualification of his or her successor or until one year shall have elapsed since the expiration of the term for which he or she was appointed, whichever first occurs. No person shall serve as a member of the board for more than two consecutive terms.

(c) The Governor shall appoint professional members so that one is
 licensed to practice engineering as a civil engineer, one as an electrical engineer, one as a mechanical engineer, another is authorized to use the title of structural engineer, and one is a member of one of the remaining branches of engineering. One of the professional members licensed under this chapter, under Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 7800), or under Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 8700) shall be from a local public agency, and one shall be from a state agency.

(d) The Governor shall appoint six of the public members and the professional members qualified as provided in Section 6711. The Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint a public member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 432, Sec. 4.   (SB 944)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6713.

Each appointing authority shall have the power to remove from office at any time any member of the board appointed by that authority pursuant to Section 106.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 588, Sec. 4.   (AB 3253)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6714.

The board shall appoint an executive officer at a salary to be fixed and determined by the board with the approval of the Director of Finance.

This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 588, Sec. 5.   (AB 3253)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6715.

The board shall compile and maintain, or may have compiled and maintained on its behalf, a register of all licensees that contains information showing the name, address of record, type of branch license, license number, the date the license was issued, and the date the license will expire.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 657, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

6716.

(a) The board may adopt rules and regulations consistent with law and necessary to govern its action. These rules and regulations shall be adopted in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(b) The board may adopt rules and regulations of professional conduct that are not inconsistent with state and federal law. The rules and regulations may include definitions of incompetence and negligence. Every person who holds a license or certificate issued by the board pursuant to this chapter shall be governed by these rules and regulations.

(c) The board shall hold at least two regular meetings each year. Special meetings shall be held at those times that the board’s rules provide. A majority of the board constitutes a quorum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 658, Sec. 93.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6717.

The board may, by regulation, define the scope of each branch of professional engineering other than civil, electrical, and mechanical engineering for which registration is provided under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1006, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6718.

Any member of the board may administer oaths and may take testimony and proofs concerning all matters within the board’s jurisdiction.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1709.)
-------------------------------------------

6719.

The board shall adopt and have an official seal which shall be affixed to all certificates of registration.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1709.)
-------------------------------------------

6720.

Each member of the board shall receive a per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1645.)
-------------------------------------------

6721.

The board shall establish relations with bodies that regulate the practice of professional engineering, or closely related professions, or that register or license professional engineers in other states, and may establish relations with those bodies in other countries, for the purposes of working toward uniformly high professional standards and mutual recognition of registration and licensure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 432, Sec. 5.   (SB 944)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6726.

The board may establish one or more technical advisory committees to advise and assist the board with respect to the following:

(1) Application review and verification for any level of registration, licensure, authority, or title.

(2) Evaluation and investigation of potential violations of the act.

(3) Amendment, repeal, adoption, or revision of board rules, regulations, policies, and procedures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1134, Sec. 1.2.)
-------------------------------------------

6726.1.

Each member of each technical advisory committee shall be appointed by the board and shall serve at the pleasure of the board. Each committee shall be composed of no more than five members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1134, Sec. 1.3.)
-------------------------------------------

6726.2.

Each member of each technical advisory committee shall be an expert in the branch of engineering within the committee’s jurisdiction and shall be licensed under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 658, Sec. 94.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6726.3.

All the members of each technical advisory committee shall serve without compensation but shall receive per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1134, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

6726.4.

Each member of each technical advisory committee shall be granted the same immunity as is granted to a public employee pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 820) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1134, Sec. 1.6.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.3. Professional Engineers Review Committees [6728. - 6728.6.]

6728.

The board, when it deems necessary, may establish professional engineers review committees to hear all matters assigned by the board, including, but not limited to, any contested case which is assigned by the board. Each committee shall exist so long as the board deems that it is necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 558.)
-------------------------------------------

6728.1.

Each review committee shall consist of no fewer than three registered professional engineers appointed by the board. Each member of a committee shall have the same qualifications and shall be subject to the same rules and regulations as if he were a member of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 558.)
-------------------------------------------

6728.2.

Each member of a committee shall receive a per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 558.)
-------------------------------------------

6728.3.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, all hearings which are conducted by a committee shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370), Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500), Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code.

If a contested case is heard by a committee, the hearing officer who presided at the hearing shall be present during the committee’s consideration of the case and, if requested, shall assist and advise the committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1013, Sec. 53.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6728.4.

At the conclusion of any hearing which is conducted by a committee, the committee shall prepare a proposed decision, in such form that it may be adopted by the board as the decision in the case, and shall transmit it to the board. The proposed decision shall be subject to the same procedure as the proposed decision of a hearing officer under subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 11517 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 558.)
-------------------------------------------

6728.5.

The board may adopt, amend, or repeal, in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code, rules and regulations necessary to implement these sections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1013, Sec. 54.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6728.6.

Each member of a professional engineers review committee or other board-appointed committee and any board-appointed representative of the board shall be granted the same immunity as is granted to a public employee pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 820) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 229, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Application of Chapter [6730. - 6749.]

6730.

In order to safeguard life, health, property and public welfare, any person, either in a public or private capacity, except as in this chapter specifically excepted, who practices, or offers to practice, civil engineering, electrical engineering or mechanical engineering, in any of its branches in this state, including any person employed by the State of California, or any city, county, or city and county, who practices engineering, shall submit evidence that he or she is qualified to practice, and shall be licensed accordingly as a civil engineer, electrical
 engineer or mechanical engineer by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 658, Sec. 95.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6730.2.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the licensure requirements that are imposed upon private sector professional engineers and engineering partnerships, firms, or corporations shall be imposed upon the state and any city, county, or city and county that shall adhere to those requirements. Therefore, for the purposes of Section 6730 and this chapter, at least one licensed engineer shall be designated the person in responsible charge of professional engineering work for each branch of professional engineering practiced in any department or agency of the state, city, county, or city and county.

 (b) Any department or agency of the state or any city, county, or city and county
 that has an unlicensed person in responsible charge of engineering work on January 1, 1985, shall be exempt from this requirement until that time as the person currently in responsible charge is replaced.

(c) The designated person in responsible charge of professional civil engineering work of any department or agency of the state, city, county, city and county, district, or special district pursuant to this section is responsible for compliance with subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 8771.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 400, Sec. 9.   (SB 1467)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

6731.

Civil engineering embraces the following studies or activities in connection with fixed works for irrigation, drainage, waterpower, water supply, flood control, inland waterways, harbors, municipal improvements, railroads, highways, tunnels, airports and airways, purification of water, sewerage, refuse disposal, foundations, grading, framed and homogeneous structures, buildings, or bridges:

(a) The economics of, the use and design of, materials of construction and the determination of their physical qualities.

(b) The supervision
 of the construction of engineering structures.

(c) The investigation of the laws, phenomena and forces of nature.

(d) Appraisals or valuations.

(e) The preparation or submission of designs, plans and specifications and engineering reports.

(f) Coordination of the work of professional, technical, or special consultants.

(g) Creation, preparation, or modification of electronic or computerized data in the performance of the activities described in subdivisions (a) through (f). 

Civil engineering also includes city and regional planning insofar as any of the above features are concerned therein.

Civil
 engineers registered prior to January 1, 1982, shall be authorized to practice all land surveying as defined in Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 8700) of Division 3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1226, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6731.1.

Civil engineering also includes the practice or offer to practice, either in a public or private capacity, all of the following:

(a) Locates, relocates, establishes, reestablishes, or retraces the alignment or elevation for any of the fixed works embraced within the practice of civil engineering, as described in Section 6731.

(b) Determines the
 configuration or contour of the earth’s surface or the position of fixed objects above, on, or below the surface of earth by applying the principles of trigonometry or photogrammetry.

(c) Creates, prepares, or modifies electronic or computerized data in the performance of the activities described in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(d) Renders a statement regarding the accuracy of maps or measured survey data pursuant to subdivisions (a), (b), and (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 760, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6731.2.

Any registered civil engineer may offer to practice, procure, and offer to procure, land surveying work incidental to his or her civil engineering practice, even though he or she is not authorized to perform that work, provided all the land surveying work is performed by, or under the direction of, a licensed land surveyor or registered civil engineer authorized to practice land surveying. Further, any registered civil engineer may manage or conduct as manager, proprietor, or agent, a civil engineering practice which offers to practice, procure, and offers to procure,
 such incidental land surveying work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 760, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

6731.3.

A registered civil engineer may also practice or offer to practice, either in a public or private capacity, construction project management services, including, but not limited to, construction project design review and evaluation, construction mobilization and supervision, bid evaluation, project scheduling, cost-benefit analysis, claims review and negotiation, and general management and administration of a construction project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6731.4.

If a registered civil engineer provides construction management services pursuant to Section 6731.3, Section 6703.1 shall not limit the responsibility of the engineer for the services actually provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 786, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6731.5.

(a) Electrical engineering is that branch of professional engineering described in Section 6734.1 that embraces studies or activities relating to the generation, transmission, and utilization of electrical energy, including the design of electrical, electronic, and magnetic circuits, and the technical control of their operation and of the design of electrical gear. It is concerned with the research, organizational, and economic aspects of the above.

(b) The design of electronic
 and magnetic circuits is not exclusive to the practice of electrical engineering, as defined in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1006, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6731.6.

Mechanical engineering is that branch of professional engineering described in Section 6734.2 that deals with engineering problems relating to generation, transmission, and utilization of energy in the thermal or mechanical form and also with engineering problems relating to the production of tools, machinery, and their products, and to heating, ventilation, refrigeration, and plumbing. It is concerned with the research, design, production, operational, organizational, and economic aspects of the above.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1006, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6732.

It is unlawful for anyone other than a professional engineer licensed under this chapter to stamp or seal any plans, specifications, plats, reports, or other documents with the seal or stamp of a professional engineer, or in any manner, use the title “professional engineer,” “licensed engineer,” “registered engineer,” or “consulting engineer,” or any of the following branch titles: “agricultural engineer,” “chemical engineer,” “civil engineer,” “control system engineer,” “electrical engineer,” “fire protection engineer,” “industrial engineer,” “mechanical
 engineer,” “metallurgical engineer,” “nuclear engineer,” “petroleum engineer,” or “traffic engineer,” or any combination of these words and phrases or abbreviations thereof unless licensed under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 789, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6732.1.

Any person who has been granted permission to use the title “consulting engineer” pursuant to legislation enacted at the 1963, 1965, or 1968 Regular Session is exempt from the provisions of Section 6732 as it restricts the use of the title “consulting engineer”, and such exemption shall apply so long as the applicant remains in practice and advises the board of any change of address within 30 days of such change. The board may adopt such rules under provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act as are necessary to implement this section.

The provisions of Articles 5 (commencing with Section 6775), 6 (commencing with Section 6785),
 and 7 (commencing with Section 6795) of this chapter shall apply to all persons who are granted permission to use the title “consulting engineer” pursuant to legislation enacted in 1963 and 1965 and the amendments to this section enacted at the 1968 Regular Session.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 896.)
-------------------------------------------

6732.2.

Any person who possesses a valid certificate to practice photogrammetry issued to him under the provisions of Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 8700) of this division may apply for, and be issued, a certificate of authority to use the title “consulting engineer,” if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(a) Application is made on a form provided by the board and is accompanied by the fees prescribed in Section 8805.

(b) Information submitted evidences to the satisfaction of the board that the applicant has had five years of independent
 control in furnishing consulting photogrammetric, geodetic, or topographic surveying services or consulting surveying services in connection with fixed works as defined in Section 6731.

Authority to use the title “consulting engineer” granted under this section does not affect authorizations made under the several provisions provided in Section 6732.1.

Authority to use the title “consulting engineer” granted under this section shall remain valid only while its holder’s basic license is valid, and if it lapses it may be renewed only as provided in Article 7 (commencing with Section 6795).

The provisions of Article 5 (commencing with Section 6775), Article 6 (commencing with Section 6785), and Article 7 (commencing with Section 6795), of this chapter, shall apply to the certificates issued as provided in this section and to the persons so certificated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 888.)
-------------------------------------------

6732.3.

(a) Any person who has received from the board a license in corrosion, manufacturing, quality, or safety engineering, and who holds a valid license under this chapter, may continue to use the branch title of the branch in which the professional engineer is legally licensed. A person holding a license in corrosion, manufacturing, quality, or safety engineering is subject to the license renewal provisions of this chapter.

(b) The professional engineer also may continue to use the
 title of “professional engineer,” “licensed engineer,” “registered engineer,” or “consulting engineer.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 658, Sec. 96.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6732.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person who has applied for registration as a corrosion, quality, or safety engineer, and who has completed the written examination in one or more of these branch titles prior to January 1, 1999, shall be issued a registration in the branch title for which the applicant was examined, provided that he or she has met all other qualifications for registration. The board shall not administer any examination for registration as a corrosion, quality, or safety engineer on or after January 1,
 1999.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person who has applied for registration as a manufacturing engineer, and who has completed the written examination for this branch title prior to January 1, 2004, shall be issued a registration as a manufacturing engineer, provided that he or she has met all other qualifications for registration. The board shall not administer any examination for registration as a manufacturing engineer on or after January 1, 2004.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 789, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6732.5.

(a) Upon the discontinuance of a national examination for a branch specified in this chapter, the board shall not be required to administer an examination for a license in that branch or be required to issue licenses in that branch.

(b) Any person who has received from the board a license in a branch for which the national examination is discontinued, and who holds a valid license under this chapter, may continue to use the branch title of the branch in which the professional
 engineer is legally licensed. A person holding a license in the affected branch of engineering is subject to the license renewal provisions of this chapter. The professional engineer may also continue to use the title of “professional engineer,” “licensed engineer,” or “consulting engineer.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 658, Sec. 97.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6733.

It is unlawful for anyone to stamp or seal any plans, specifications, plats, reports, or other documents with the seal after the certificate of the registrant, named thereon, has expired or has been suspended or revoked, unless the certificate has been renewed or reissued.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1709.)
-------------------------------------------

6734.

Any person practices civil engineering when he professes to be a civil engineer or is in responsible charge of civil engineering work.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1709.)
-------------------------------------------

6734.1.

Any person practices electrical engineering when he professes to be an electrical engineer or is in responsible charge of electrical engineering work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

6734.2.

Any person practices mechanical engineering when he professes to be a mechanical engineer or is in responsible charge of mechanical engineering work.
